District of Columbia statutes.
19-1309.03

Diversification.

A trustee shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the trustee reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
2001 Ed., § 28-4703.
1981 Ed., § 28-4703.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Prudent Investor Act.